Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB265.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. November 14 of each year, the same being the anniversary
of Ruby Bridges' first day attending William Frantz elementary school, is
hereby designated as Ruby Bridges walk to school day in the state of
Kansas. Any year in which November 14 falls on a Saturday or Sunday,
Ruby Bridges walk to school day shall be commemorated on the following
Wednesday.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.